Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2132.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "justice of the peace" in section 102 of the act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951, is amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 102. Definitions.--As used in this act--["Justice of the peace" means district justices, aldermen, magistrates or any other court having jurisdiction over landlord and tenant matters, excluding a court of common pleas.]"Magisterial district judge" means district justices, aldermen, magistrates or any other court having jurisdiction 1234567891011121314151617181920 over landlord and tenant matters, excluding a court of common pleas.* * *Section 2. Section 502(a) of the act is amended to read:Section 502. Summons and Service.--(a) Upon the filing of the complaint, the [justice of the peace] magisterial district judge shall issue a summons which recites substantially the complaint, is directed to any writ server, constable or the sheriff of the county and commands that writ server, constable or sheriff to summon the tenant to appear before the [justice of the peace] magisterial district judge to answer the complaint on a date not less than seven nor more than ten days from the date of the summons.* * *Section 3. Section 503(a) introductory paragraph and (b) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 503. Hearing; Judgment; Writ of Possession; Payment of Rent by Tenant.--(a) On the day and at the time appointed or on a day to which the case may be adjourned, the [justice of the peace] magisterial district judge shall proceed to hear the case. If it appears that the complaint has been sufficiently proven, the [justice of the peace] magisterial district judge shall enter judgment against the tenant:* * *(b) At the request of the landlord, the [justice of the peace] magisterial district judge shall, after the fifth day after the rendition of the judgment, issue a writ of possession directed to the writ server, constable or sheriff commanding him to deliver forthwith actual possession of the real property to 20260HB2132PN2757 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the landlord and to levy the costs and amount of judgment for damages and rent, if any, on the tenant, in the same manner as judgments and costs are levied and collected on writs of execution. This writ is to be served within no later than forty-eight hours and executed on the eleventh day following service upon the tenant of the leased premises. Service of the writ of possession shall be served personally on the tenant by personal service or by posting the writ conspicuously on the leased premises.* * *(d) A landlord may not require a tenant to pay to the landlord any costs associated with filing the complaint. To supersede and render the writ of possession of no effect under subsection (c), the tenant shall pay to the writ server, constable or sheriff the rent actually in arrears and the costs associated with the amount of rent that remains due and unpaid.(e) Any provision in a contract or lease that requires a tenant to pay costs associated with filing the complaint is void and unenforceable.Section 4. Sections 504 and 513(e) of the act are amended to read:Section 504. Return by Constable or Sheriff.--The writ server, constable or sheriff shall make return of the writ of possession to the [justice of the peace] magisterial district judge within ten days after receiving the writ. The return shall show: (1) the date, time, place and manner of service of the writ; (2) if the writ was satisfied by the payment of rent due or in arrears and costs by or on behalf of the tenant, the amount of that payment and its distribution; (3) the time and date of any forcible entry and ejectment, or that no entry for 20260HB2132PN2757 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the purpose of ejectment had been made; and (4) his expenses and fees, which expenses and fees shall have been paid by the tenant or, if paid by the landlord, reimbursed to the landlord by the tenant in order to satisfy the writ.Section 513. Appeal by Tenant to Common Pleas Court.--* * *(e) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Lower court." [District justice, magistrate] A magisterial district judge or any other court having jurisdiction over landlord and tenant matters, excluding a court of common pleas."Victim of domestic violence." A person who has obtained a protection from abuse order against another individual or can provide other suitable evidence as the court shall direct.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2132PN2757 - 4 - 123456789101112131415